apertium-bak.bak.lexc
LEXICON PRON-PERS

мин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:м PRON-P12SG-CASES ;

һин%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:һ PRON-P12SG-CASES ;

ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<nom%>:ул CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<gen%>:уның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<dat%>:уға CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<acc%>:уны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<loc%>:унда CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<abl%>:унан CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<px%>:уныҡы%{n%} CASES ;
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<sim%>:ундәй CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! FIXME check
ул%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<sg%>%<adv%>:уныңса CLITICS-NO-COP ;

беҙ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:беҙ PRON-PERS-INFL ;
беҙ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p1%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:беҙҙеңсә CLITICS-NO-COP ;

һеҙ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:һеҙ PRON-PERS-INFL ;
һеҙ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:һеҙҙеңсә CLITICS-NO-COP ;

улар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:улар PRON-PERS-INFL ;
улар%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p3%>%<pl%>%<adv%>:уларҙыңса CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! FIXME check

Һеҙ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sp%>%<frm%>:Һеҙ PRON-PERS-INFL ;
Һеҙ%<prn%>%<pers%>%<p2%>%<sp%>%<frm%>%<adv%>:Һеҙҙеңсә CLITICS-NO-COP ;

!!!!!!!   D E M O N S T R A T I V E

LEXICON PRON-DEM-INFL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:%{N%}%{I%}ң CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:%{G%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:%{N%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:%{N%}%{A%}н CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:нд%{A%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px%>:%{L%}%{I%}%{K%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES ; ! FIXME check
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:нд%{A%}г%{I%} ATTR-SUBST ; ! FIXME check
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:нд%{I%}й CASES ; ! FIXME check
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:л%{A%}й CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! FIXME check
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:%{h%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES ; ! FIXME check

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES-ETC ; ! FIXME check
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%{I%}%{n%} CASES ; ! FIXME check

LEXICON PRON-DEM-BUL-ŠUL

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:л CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:ның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:ға CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:ны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:нда CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:нан CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px%>:ныҡы%{n%} CASES ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:ндағы ATTR-SUBST ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:лай CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<qnt%>:л% тиклем CLITICS-NO-COP ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:ныһы%{n%} CASES ;

%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:лар CASES-ETC ; ! FIXME check
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:лары{n%} CASES ; ! FIXME check

LEXICON PRON-DEM-UL       ! FIXME: Unify demonstrative pronouns later

ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>:ул CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:уның CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:уға CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:уны CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:унда CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:унан CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px%>:уныҡы%{n%} CASES ;
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:ундағы ATTR-SUBST ;
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<sim%>:ундәй CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! FIXME check
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<adv%>:улай CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<px3sp%>:улы%{n%} CASES ;

ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:улар CASES-ETC ;
ул%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:улары%{n%} CASES ;

LEXICON DemonstrativePronouns

PRON-DEM-UL ; ! ""

был:бы PRON-DEM-BUL-ŠUL ; ! ""
шул:шу PRON-DEM-BUL-ŠUL ; ! ""
теге:теге PRON-DEM-INFL ; ! ""
ошо:ошо PRON-DEM-INFL ; 

LEXICON PRON-IND

%<prn%>%<ind%>: CASES ;

!!!!!!!   I N T E R R O G A T I V E

LEXICON PRON-ITG-INFL

%<prn%>%<itg%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-QAYHI

ҡайһы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<nom%>:ҡайһы CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ҡайһы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<gen%>:ҡайһының CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ҡайһы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<dat%>:ҡайһына CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ҡайһы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<acc%>:ҡайһын CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ҡайһы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<abl%>:ҡайһынан CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ҡайһы%<prn%>%<itg%>%<loc%>:ҡайһында CLITICS-NO-COP ;

ҡайһы%<prn%>%<itg%>:ҡайһы GER-POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON PRON-ITG-NINDI

! Might be not complete (қандайларығыз? and possessive stuff in general)

ниндәй%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>:ниндәй CLITICS-NO-COP ;
ниндәй%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>:ниндәй CASES ; ! Dir/LR ! FIXME check
ниндәй%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<px3sp%>:ниндәй%{n%} CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! FIXME check
ниндәй%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<px3sp%>:ниндәй%{n%} CASES ; ! Dir/LR ! FIXME check
ниндәй%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>:ниндәйҙәр CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! FIXME check
ниндәй%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>:ниндәйҙәр CASES ; ! Dir/LR ! FIXME check
ниндәй%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:ниндәйҙәрен%{n%} CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! FIXME check
ниндәй%<prn%>%<itg%>%<sim%>%<pl%>%<px3sp%>:ниндәйҙәрен%{n%} CASES ; ! Dir/LR ! FIXME check

LEXICON InterrogativePronouns

PRON-ITG-QAYHI ;
PRON-ITG-NINDI ;
ни:ни PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "what"
нимә:нимә PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! ""
кем:кем PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! "who"
күпме:күпме PRON-ITG-INFL ; ! ""

LEXICON PRON-QNT-POSS

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: GER-POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: GER-INFL ;

LEXICON PRNNEG

%<prn%>%<neg%>: CASES ;

LEXICON PRON-RECIP

%<prn%>%<recip%>: GER-POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON PRON-REF-ADV

CASES-ETC ;
%<adv%>:сә CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON PRON-REF

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px3sp%>:%>%{h%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ; ! FIXME <px3sg>?
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}ҙ PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}ҙ PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px3pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{h%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}ҙ PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}ҙ PRON-REF-ADV ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!      DETERMINERS

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-ITG

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-NEG

%<det%>%<neg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;

!==============================================================================!
!                         PART-OF-SPEECH LEXICONS
! Stems will continue with one of the following lexicons:
!==============================================================================!

LEXICON N1

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON N1-RUS

:%{☭%} N1 ;

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX

!%<n%>:%>%{h%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ;
%<n%>:%>%{h%}%{I%} CASES-POSSESSIVES-PX3-SG ;
!%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%>%{h%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ; ! (e.g. чик сакчылары=пограничники)
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%>%{h%}%{I%} CASES-POSSESSIVES-PX3-SG ;
%<n%>: POSSESSIVES ; ! for stuff like "біздің ауа райымыз" and even "оның ауа райы",
               ! which should have a <px3sp> analysis

LEXICON N3
! Singularia tantum

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: CASES-ETC ;
%<n%>: POSSESSIVES ;
%<n%>: ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON ADV-LANG

N1 ;
ADV ;

LEXICON NP-COMMON

CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;
ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: CASES ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-F

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OBIN-FEM

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<pl%>:а%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OB

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./
! Also, even the ев ones are normally pronounced
!    (and take harmony) as if they end in йыф/йып

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;                       ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{☭%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{а%}%{с%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{а%}%{с%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;

 LEXICON Nouns
мигрень:мигрень%{ь%} N1 ; ! ""
район:район N1-RUS ; ! ""
янғын:янғын N1 ; ! ""
академизм:академизм N1 ; ! ""
Аллаһы% Тәғәлә:Аллаһы% Тәғәлә N3 ; ! ""
атыу% урыны:атыу% урыны N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
балта% оҫталығы:балта% оҫталығы N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
бер% туғандың% улы:бер% туғандың% улы N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
туңлыҡ:туңлыҡ N1 ; ! ""
горилла:горилла N1 ; ! ""
библиография:библиография N1 ; ! ""
блог:блог N1-RUS  ; ! ""
Будда:Будда N3  ; ! ""
власть% ияһы:власть% ияһы N-COMPOUND-PX  ; ! ""
дилер:дилер%{ъ%} N1-RUS  ; ! ""
өҫ%-башы% бысраҡ% кеше% ҡылы:өҫ%-башы% бысраҡ% кеше% ҡылы N-COMPOUND-PX  ; ! ""
звание:звание N1-RUS  ; ! ""
инфраструктура:инфраструктура N1-RUS  ; ! ""
йоҙроҡ% һуғышы:йоҙроҡ% һуғышы N-COMPOUND-PX  ; ! ""
коммент:коммент%{ъ%} N1-RUS  ; ! ""
ҡуян% балаһы:ҡуян% балаһы N-COMPOUND-PX  ; ! ""
метаболизм:метаболизм%{ъ%} N1-RUS  ; ! ""
иҫәп% һаны:иҫәп% һаны N-COMPOUND-PX  ; ! ""
полицейский:полицейский%{ъ%} N1-RUS  ; ! ""
полк% башлығы:полк% башлығы N-COMPOUND-PX  ; ! ""
саммит:саммит%{ъ%} N1-RUS  ; ! ""
спикер:спикер%{ъ%} N1-RUS  ; ! ""
тормош% иптәше:тормош% иптәше N-COMPOUND-PX  ; ! ""
хәҙерге% заман:хәҙерге% заман N3  ; ! ""
шаманизм:шаманизм%{ъ%} N1-RUS  ; ! ""
яҙыу% машинкаһы:яҙыу% машинкаһы N-COMPOUND-PX  ; ! ""
резиденция:резиденция N1 ; ! ""
алдатҡыс:алдатҡыс N1 ; ! ""
 LEXICON ProperNouns
Эр%-Рияд:Эр%-Рияд NP-TOP ; ! ""
Кәрим% Ысынлы:Кәрим% Ысынлы NP-TOP ; ! "" FIXME check
Үрге% Руссаға:Үрге% Руссаға NP-TOP ; ! "" FIXME check
Ат%-Юган:Ат%-Юган NP-TOP ; ! ""
Лель:Лель NP-TOP ; ! ""
Тарамбал:Тарамбал NP-TOP ; ! ""
Ҡарабалыҡ:Ҡарабалыҡ NP-TOP ; ! ""
Шыңғыр:Шыңғыр NP-TOP ; ! ""
Ураҡ:Ураҡ NP-TOP ; ! ""
Мәсет% ҡалҡыуы:Мәсет% ҡалҡыуы NP-TOP ; ! ""
Гандзакеци:Гандзакеци NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Исхаҡов:Исхаҡов NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Нәбиуллин:Нәбиуллин NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Рәжәпов:Рәжәпов NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Тазиев:Тазиев NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Тупиков:Тупиков NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Әсәҙуллин:Әсәҙуллин NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Әүбәкирова:Әүбәкирова NP-COG-F ; ! ""
Байкова:Байкова NP-COG-F ; ! ""
Баталова:Баталова NP-COG-F ; ! ""
Башкортова:Башкортова NP-COG-F ; ! ""
Биишева:Биишева NP-COG-F ; ! ""
Кейем%-һалым:Кейем%-һалым NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Фатих:Фатих NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Эльмира:Эльмира NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Ғилмисафа:Ғилмисафа NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Мөбәрәк:Мөбәрәк NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Хәбибулла:Хәбибулла NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Мөһимл:Мөһимл NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Йөҙөк:Йөҙөк NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Бибизиә:Бибизиә NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Хажиә:Хажиә NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Рифа:Рифа NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Ғизелниса:Ғизелниса NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Ғәззәбану:Ғәззәбану NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Әхмәтвафа:Әхмәтвафа NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Хан:Хан NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Бибикамал:Бибикамал NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Шәмсибәһәр:Шәмсибәһәр NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Атаулла:Атаулла NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Карам:Карам NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Собханғол:Собханғол NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Достоевский:Достоевский NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Зөлҡәрнәй:Зөлҡәрнәй NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Йыуан:Йыуан NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Ахмадинежад:Ахмадинежад NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Василенко:Василенко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
да% Винчи:да% Винчи NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Ибсен:Ибсен%{ъ%} NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Кушнаренко:Кушнаренко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Мейер:Мейер%{ъ%} NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Планк:Планк NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Старченко:Старченко NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Йәриәһе:Йәриәһе NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
әл%-Ҡортҡаһын:әл%-Ҡортҡаһын NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Әҙһәмов:Әҙһәмов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Борзов:Борзов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Ғозаиров:Ғозаиров NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Жапаров:Жапаров NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Касьянов:Касьянов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Динов:Динов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Мурзагалиева:Мурзагалиева NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Перцев:Перцев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Томилов:Томилов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Юсупов:Юсупов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
гратификация:гратификация N1 ; ! ""
эскалация:эскалация N1 ; ! ""
неподсудность:неподсудность N1 ; ! ""
а.:а. N1 ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adverbs
бретонса:бретонса ADV-LANG ; ! ""
грузинса:грузинса ADV-LANG ; ! ""
ингушса:ингушса ADV-LANG ; ! ""
каталанса:каталанса ADV-LANG ; ! ""
ҡаҙаҡса:ҡаҙаҡса ADV-LANG ; ! ""
латинса:латинса ADV-LANG ; ! ""
мордваса:мордваса ADV-LANG ; ! ""
португальса:португальса ADV-LANG ; ! ""
сыуашса:сыуашса ADV-LANG ; ! ""
төрөксә:төрөксә ADV-LANG ; ! ""
эрзясә:эрзясә ADV-LANG ; ! ""
